Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6042.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,500,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,500,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 11,500,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,500,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,500,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 11,500,000 (2) WATER INFRASTRUCTURE Macomb County interceptor drain project $ 11,500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 11,500,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 11,500,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $11,500,000.00 and state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $11,500,000.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for Macomb County interceptor drain project shall be used by the department to prevent sinkholes and the collapse of a major sewer system that carries raw sewage for at least 500,000 county residents. Funds must be used to rehabilitate a 1.5-mile section of the 15-mile interceptor, which is part of the Macomb interceptor drain drainage 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 district serving residents in 11 of Macomb County's communities. (2) Funds appropriated in part 1 must be used to provide steel-ribbed PVC spiral-wound lining to line along the inside wall of the pipe that is 5 feet in diameter and 268 vertical feet of manhole risers. (3) Funds appropriated in part 1 must be used to reduce hydrogen sulfide gas, prevent pipe degradation, and eliminate odors. Sec. 302. The department shall seek any and all federal and local reimbursements to offset general fund/general purpose revenues appropriated for Macomb County interceptor drain project. Sec. 303. The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for Macomb County interceptor drain project are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to prevent sinkholes and the collapse of a major sewer system that carries raw sewage and serves residents in 11 of Macomb County's communities. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracting with vendors, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $11,500,000.00. (d) The estimated completion date is September 30, 2027.